Louisiana, session 2026, HB420.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 36:474(B)(1)(a)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 36:474(A)(10) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§474. Powers and duties of the secretary of the Department of Children and Family
Services
A. In addition to the functions, powers, and duties otherwise vested in the
secretary by law, he shall:
* * *
(10) Conduct a criminal background check and a search of the state central
registry of substantiated abuse or neglect reports for all employees and prospective
employees of the department in accordance with R.S. 46:51.2.
* * *
B. The secretary shall have authority to:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in R.S. 36:801 and 802.9:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 420 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 46:51.2(A)(1)(introductory paragraph) and (2) are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
§51.2. Criminal history and central registry information
A.(1) No person shall be hired by the department whose duties include the
investigation of child abuse or neglect, supervisory or disciplinary authority over
children, direct care of a child, or performance of licensing surveys, until both the
following conditions are met:
* * *
(2) Any employee of the department whose duties include the investigation
of child abuse or neglect, supervisory or disciplinary authority over children, direct
care of a child, or performance of licensing surveys and whose name is recorded on
the state central registry subsequent to January 1, 2010, shall be terminated by the
department. A permanent classified employee shall not be terminated until he has
exhausted his administrative appeal rights pursuant to Children's Code Article
616.1.1.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.